Missouri, session 2026, HB2239.
Be it enacted by the General Assembly of the state of Missouri, as follows:
Section A. Chapter 640, RSMo, is amended by adding thereto one new section, to be
known as section 640.1600, to read as follows:
640.1600. 1. This section shall be known and may be cited as the "Artificial
Intelligence Data Center Environmental Accountability Act".
2. As used in this section, the following terms mean:
(1) "Artificial intelligence (AI)-optimized data center", a facility designed
primarily for artificial intelligence model training or inference workloads utilizing
graphics processing units, tensor processing units, or similar accelerators, with a
combined IT load capacity of one hundred megawatts or greater;
(2) "Closed-loop water cooling system", a sealed, recirculating system that
transfers heat through a controlled circuit without continuous withdrawal or discharge
of water from natural or municipal sources, except for limited make-up losses;
(3) "Department", the department of natural resources;
(4) "Environmental and health report", an annual, publicly available document
submitted by an AI-optimized data center operator detailing water, air, energy, waste,
and community health metrics;
(5) "Operator", the entity responsible for the day-to-day operation of the AI-
optimized data center.
3. This section shall apply to:
EXPLANATION — Matter enclosed in bold-faced brackets [thus] in the above bill is not enacted and is
intended to be omitted from the law. Matter in bold-face type in the above bill is proposed language.

HB 2239 2
(1) All AI-optimized data centers constructed, expanded, or permitted on or
after August 28, 2027, with a total installed capacity of one hundred megawatts or
greater; and
(2) Beginning August 28, 2027, any existing data center undergoing a capacity
increase of twenty-five percent or more that brings the total IT load to one hundred
megawatts or greater.
4. Each AI-optimized data center subject to this section shall:
(1) Implement a closed-loop water cooling system, or an alternative system
verified by the department to achieve equal or lower water withdrawal and discharge
intensity per megawatt-hour of compute load;
(2) Incorporate continuous monitoring of make-up water volume, discharge
temperature, and chemical concentrations; and
(3) Maintain emergency and redundancy protocols to prevent thermal pollution
or water contamination in the event of system failure.
5. (1) Each operator shall submit, before April first of each year, an
environmental and health report for the preceding calendar year to the department in
accordance with the standardized digital formats and reporting templates created by
the department as authorized under this section or by rule.
(2) The report shall include the following information:
(a) Total annual water withdrawn, recycled, and discharged in gallons or liters;
(b) Sources of water such as municipal, groundwater, or recycled, and discharge
locations;
(c) Water quality metrics including pH, temperature, biocides, metals, and
chemical additives;
(d) Documentation of closed-loop performance efficiency, make-up water
percentage, and any leaks or discharges;
(e) Total electricity consumption and percentage derived from renewable
sources;
(f) Annual greenhouse gas emissions and emissions from backup generators
calculated using different types of equivalent units in the calculator and reported as
carbon dioxide equivalents;
(g) Load factor and peak demand data for transparency with local grid
operators;
(h) Quantities of electronic waste, batteries, and refrigerants disposed or
recycled;
(i) Record of chemical use for cooling or maintenance processes;

HB 2239 3
(j) Air and water quality monitoring results within a five-mile radius of the
facility;
(k) Any public health complaints or incidents linked to data center operations;
(l) Noise, traffic, or land-use impacts, if applicable;
(m) Summary of community benefit initiatives including, but not limited to,
infrastructure investments, renewable offsets, or workforce programs; and
(n) Documentation of all inspections, violations, and corrective actions taken
during the reporting year.
6. (1) The department shall receive, review, and archive all environmental and
health reports submitted under this section.
(2) Except as otherwise provided by law, all reports received by the department
under this section shall be made available to the public according to rules and
procedures established by the department, and no later than sixty-days after the
department receives the reports.
(3) The department shall make the reports publicly accessible on its website
according to its established rules and procedures for publishing full reports and
executive summaries on a public-facing website, and consistent with applicable federal
and state laws.
(4) The department shall create a statewide annual summary of cumulative
impacts from AI-optimized data centers and schedule a hearing or provide
opportunities for public comment where significant environmental or health risks are
identified.
7. Any violation of the provisions of this section including, but not limited to, a
violation listed in subdivision (1) or (2) of this subsection shall result in the imposition of
a civil penalty up to fifty thousand dollars per day:
(1) Failure to install a closed-loop system in compliance with the law; or
(2) Failure to submit an annual environmental and heath report under
subsection 5 of this section.
8. The department may suspend or revoke operational permits for repeated or
willful noncompliance after a hearing conducted by the administrative hearing
commission under chapter 621 and subject to the burden of proof provision under
section 640.012.
9. (1) The department shall promulgate all necessary rules and regulations for
the administration of this section including, but not limited to, the following:
(a) Definitions for the maximum permissible water use intensity (liters per
megawatt-hour);
(b) Testing and certification procedures for compliance prior to operation; and

HB 2239 4
(c) Annual verification and penalties for false reporting or noncompliance.
(2) Before August 28, 2027, the department shall promulgate rules to
standardize reporting formats, audit methods, and equivalency criteria for alternative
cooling technologies.
10. Any rule or portion of a rule, as that term is defined in section 536.010, that
is created under the authority delegated in this section shall become effective only if it
complies with and is subject to all of the provisions of chapter 536 and, if applicable,
section 536.028. This section and chapter 536 are nonseverable and if any of the powers
vested with the general assembly pursuant to chapter 536 to review, to delay the
100 effective date, or to disapprove and annul a rule are subsequently held unconstitutional,
101 then the grant of rulemaking authority and any rule proposed or adopted after August
102 28, 2026, shall be invalid and void.
103 11. The department shall coordinate with the department of health and senior
104 services, public service commission, and local governments as deemed necessary for the
105 protection of public health, conservation of water resources and providing
106 environmental and community impact reports.
✔